New York, session 2025-2026, A990.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 130 of the gener- 2 al business law, as amended by chapter 470 of the laws of 1997, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) Such person, if other than a corporation, limited partnership or 5 limited liability company, shall file in the office of the clerk of each 6 county in which such business is conducted or transacted a certificate 7 setting forth the name or designation under which and the address within 8 the county at which such business is conducted or transacted, the full 9 name or names of the person or persons conducting or transacting the 10 same, including the names of all partners, with the residence address of 11 each such person, and the age of any person less than eighteen years of 12 age. Each certificate shall be executed [and duly acknowledged] by the 13 person or, if there be more than one, by all of the persons conducting 14 the business. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01313-01-5